South Dakota, session 2026, HB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 25-6-7 be AMENDED:
25-6-7. A petition for adoption may be filed in the circuit court for any of the
following counties:
(1) The county in which the adopting parent resides;
(2) The county in which the authorized agency having care, custody, or control,
whether legal or physical, of the child involved is located; or
(3) The county in which the child involved was born or resides.

26.904.10 2 1197
An Act to revise a provision related to the venue of adoption proceedings.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1197
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1197 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1197 ENROLLED